Utah statutes.
78B-1-111.   Food allowance for jurors -- Sequestration costs.

(1)  Jurors  may be provided with a reasonable food allowance under the rules of the Judicial Council.

(2)  When a jury  has been placed in sequestration by order of the court, the necessary expenses for food and lodging shall be provided in accordance with the rules of the Judicial Council.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

